test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_sammilas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - sämmilâš: #
    sämmilâš+N+Sg+Nom: sämmilâš
    sämmilâš+N+Sg+Gen: sämmilii
    sämmilâš+N+Sg+Acc: sämmilii
    sämmilâš+N+Sg+Ill: sämmilâžân 
    sämmilâš+N+Sg+Loc: sämmiliist
    sämmilâš+N+Sg+Com: sämmilijn
    sämmilâš+N+Sg+Abe: sämmiliittáá
    sämmilâš+N+Ess: sämmilâžžân
    sämmilâš+N+Par: sämmilâžžâd
    sämmilâš+N+Pl+Nom: sämmiliih
    sämmilâš+N+Pl+Gen: sämmilij
    sämmilâš+N+Pl+Acc: sämmilijd
    sämmilâš+N+Pl+Ill: [sämmilijd, sämmiláid] 
    sämmilâš+N+Pl+Loc: sämmilijn
    sämmilâš+N+Pl+Com: [sämmilijguin, sämmilijgijn]
    sämmilâš+N+Pl+Abe: sämmilijttáá
    
  Noun - vajalâš: # 
    vajalâš+N+Sg+Nom: vajalâš
    vajalâš+N+Sg+Gen: vajalii
    vajalâš+N+Sg+Acc: vajalii
    vajalâš+N+Sg+Ill: vajalâžân 
    vajalâš+N+Sg+Loc: vajaliist
    vajalâš+N+Sg+Com: vajalijn
    vajalâš+N+Sg+Abe: vajaliittáá
    vajalâš+N+Ess: vajalâžžân
    vajalâš+N+Par: vajalâžžâd
    vajalâš+N+Pl+Nom: vajaliih
    vajalâš+N+Pl+Gen: vajalij
    vajalâš+N+Pl+Acc: vajalijd
    vajalâš+N+Pl+Ill: [vajalijd, vajaláid]
    vajalâš+N+Pl+Loc: vajalijn
    vajalâš+N+Pl+Com: [vajalijguin, vajalijgijn]
    vajalâš+N+Pl+Abe: vajalijttáá  
   
 
